Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,240
Removing flares or flags; penalty.

Any person who willfully removes any flares or red flags placed upon the highways under the provisions of sections 60-6,236 to 60-6,238 before the driver of such vehicle is ready to proceed immediately on the highway shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1935, c. 129, § 6, p. 461;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-11,117;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,121;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,166;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 336.